Utah statutes.
32B-10-605.   Religious organization exemption.

(1)  A religious organization that provides or allows to be provided an alcoholic product to a person as part of the religious organization's religious services:

(a)  does not violate this title by providing or allowing the provision of an alcoholic product as part of a religious service; and

(b)  is not required to hold a license or special use permit to provide or allow the provision of an alcoholic product for religious services.

(2)  This exemption does not exempt a religious organization from complying with this title with respect to an alcoholic product purchased by the religious organization for a purpose other than one purpose stated in Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

